Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202019-607
Election; ballot; form.

In submitting the question of adopting the city manager plan of government, the city council shall cause to be printed on the ballots the following question: Shall the city manager plan of government as provided in the City Manager Plan of Government Act be adopted? Immediately following such question there shall be printed on the ballots the following propositions in the order here set forth: For the adoption of the city manager plan of government and Against the adoption of the city manager plan of government. Immediately to the left of each proposition shall be placed an oval or a square in which the electors may vote by making a cross (X) or other clear, intelligible mark.

Laws 1917, c. 208, § 8, p. 499;

C.S.1922, § 4545;

C.S.1929, § 19-608;

R.S.1943, § 19-607;

Laws 2019, LB193, § 38.